Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Article 17. General Provisions.

Sec. 38.05.910.
Policy.

It is the policy of the state to encourage the settlement of its land and the development of its resources by making them available for maximum use consistent with the public interest.

History.

(Preamble, ch 169 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

38.05.350

. Renumbered in 1984.

Sec. 38.05.920.
Assignment.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, all contracts of purchase or lease of land or interest in land may be, on the affirmative approval of the director, assigned or subleased in whole or in part in writing by the contract holder or lessee, and the assignee or sublessee is subject to the provisions of laws and regulations applicable to the contract or lease.

A nonprofit organization that is exempted from paying rent on state land under AS

38.05.097

may not assign or sublease the land or a portion of it on which it has a lease.

History.

(§ 9 art III ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 15 ch 182 SLA 1978)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

38.05.340

. Renumbered in 1984.

Administrative Code. —

For purchase by contract, see 11 AAC 54, art. 2.

For aquatic farmsite permits and leases, see 11 AAC 63.

Sec. 38.05.930.
Bona fide purchasers.

The right, title, or interest of a bona fide purchaser of any lease, interest in a lease, or option to acquire a lease or an interest in it, acquired after the effective date of issuance of the lease and held by a qualified person, association, or corporation in conformity with this chapter may not be canceled or forfeited or otherwise adversely affected by reason of the fact that the holding of the person, association, or corporation from which the lease, interest, or option was acquired, or of a predecessor in title, including the original lessee of the state, may have been canceled or forfeited, or may be or have been subject to cancellation or forfeiture.
If, in any proceeding for cancellation or forfeiture, an underlying lease, interest, or option is canceled or forfeited to the state and there are valid interests therein or valid options to acquire the lease or an interest therein which are not subject to cancellation or forfeiture, the underlying lease, interest, or option shall be sold by the director to the highest responsible qualified bidder by competitive bidding under general competitive leasing regulations subject to all outstanding valid interests therein and valid options pertaining thereto.
Likewise if, in any such proceeding, less than the whole interest in a lease, interest, or option is canceled or forfeited to the state, the partial interests so canceled or forfeited shall be sold by the director to the highest responsible qualified bidder under general competitive leasing regulations.

History.

(§ 1 ch 18 SLA 1964; am § 68 ch 59 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

38.05.351

. Renumbered in 1984.

In 2000, “or” was inserted between “lease” and “option” in the first sentence to correct a manifest error.

Collateral references. —

Right of lessor to cancel oil or gas lease for breach of implied obligation to explore and develop further after initial discovery of oil or gas, in absence of showing reasonable expectation of profit to lessee from further drilling. 79 ALR2d 792.

Sec. 38.05.940.
Land purchase price discount for veterans.

An eligible veteran is entitled to a discount of 25 percent on the purchase price of state land sold under this title and classified under AS

38.05.005

—

38.05.270

for a use other than commercial or industrial use.

To be eligible for a discount under this section, a veteran shall submit proof, as required by regulation, that the veteran

is 18 years of age or older on the date of sale;

has been a state resident for a period of not less than one year immediately preceding the date of sale; and

has served

in the Alaska Territorial Guard for at least 90 days, unless the service was shortened due to a service connected disability; or

on active duty in the U.S. Armed Forces at least 90 days, unless tenure was shortened due to a service connected disability or due to receiving an early separation upon return from a tour of duty overseas, and has received an honorable discharge or a general discharge under honorable conditions.

A veteran is entitled to only one discount under this section during the veteran’s lifetime.

A discount under this section may be applied only to the acquisition of surface rights to state land. A discount under this section may not be applied to survey costs, road development costs, utility assessments, or other costs that the commissioner determines are reimbursable to the state.

A discount under this section may not be used toward the purchase of land offered at a restricted sale under AS

38.05.067

.

History.

(§ 48 ch 152 SLA 1984; am § 12 ch 75 SLA 1987; am § 17 ch 93 SLA 1991)

Administrative Code. —

For veterans’ land discounts, see 11 AAC 67, art. 10A.

Sec. 38.05.945.
Notice.

This section establishes the requirements for notice given by the department for the following actions:

classification or reclassification of state land under AS

38.05.300

and the closing of land to mineral leasing or entry under AS

38.05.185

;

zoning of land under applicable law;

issuance of a

preliminary written finding under AS

38.05.035(e)

(5)(A) regarding the sale, lease, or disposal of an interest in state land or resources for oil and gas, or for gas only, subject to AS

38.05.180(b)

;

written finding for the sale, lease, or disposal of an interest in state land or resources under AS

38.05.035(e)

(6), except a lease sale described in AS

38.05.035(e)(6)(F)

for which the director must provide opportunity for public comment under the provisions of that subparagraph;

a competitive disposal of an interest in state land or resources after final decision under AS 38.05.035(e);

a preliminary finding under AS 38.05.035(e) concerning sites for aquatic farms and related hatcheries;

a decision under AS

38.05.132

-

38.05.134

regarding the sale, lease, or disposal of an interest in state land or resources;

an exchange of state land under AS 38.50.

When notice is required to be given under this section,

the notice must contain sufficient information in commonly understood terms to inform the public of the nature of the action and the opportunity of the public to comment on it;

if the notice is of a preliminary written finding described in (a)(3)(A) of this section, the department shall give notice at the beginning of the public comment period for the preliminary written finding, notifying the public of the right to submit comments; the department shall give notice by

posting notice on the Alaska Online Public Notice System for at least 30 consecutive days;

publication of a notice in display advertising form describing the proposed action and referencing the online notice required in (A) of this paragraph in newspapers of statewide circulation and in newspapers of general circulation in the vicinity of the proposed action, if available, at least once a week for two consecutive weeks;

public service announcements on the electronic media serving the area to be affected by the proposed action; and

one or more of the following methods:

publication of a legal notice in newspapers of statewide circulation or in newspapers of general circulation in the vicinity of the proposed action, if available, at least once a week for two consecutive weeks;

posting in a conspicuous location in the vicinity of the action;

notification of parties known or likely to be affected by the action; or

another method calculated to reach affected parties;

if the notice is of an action described in (a) of this section, other than notice of an action under (a)(3)(A) of this section, the department shall give notice at least 30 days before the action by posting notice on the Alaska Online Public Notice System for at least 30 consecutive days and by one or more of the following methods:

publication of a notice in display advertising form describing the proposed action and referencing the online notice required in this paragraph in newspapers of statewide circulation and in newspapers of general circulation in the vicinity of the proposed action, if available, at least once a week for two consecutive weeks;

publication through public service announcements on the electronic media serving the area affected by the action;

posting in a conspicuous location in the vicinity of the action;

notification of parties known or likely to be affected by the action; or

another method calculated to reach affected persons.

Notice at least 30 days before action under (a) of this section shall also be given to the following:

to a municipality if the land is within the boundaries of the municipality, to a coordinating body established by community councils in a municipality if the coordinating body or a community council within the area served by a coordinating body requests notice in writing: if there is no coordinating body within the municipality, notice shall be provided to each community council established by the charter or ordinance of the municipality if the land is located within the boundaries of the municipality and if the community council requests notice in writing;

to a regional corporation if the boundaries of the corporation as established by 43 U.S.C. 1606(a) (sec. 7(a), Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act) encompass the land and the land is outside a municipality;

to a village corporation organized under 43 U.S.C. 1607(a) (sec. 8(a), Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act) if the land is within 25 miles of the village for which the corporation was established and the land is located outside a municipality;

to the postmaster of a permanent settlement of more than 25 persons located within 25 miles of the land if the land is located outside a municipality, with a request that the notice be posted in a conspicuous location;

to a nonprofit community organization or a governing body that has requested notification in writing and provided a map of its boundaries, if the land is within the boundaries.

Notice at least 30 days before action under (a)(5) of this section shall be given to appropriate regional fish and game councils established under AS

16.05.260

.

Notice is not required under this section for a permit or other authorization revocable by the department.

The provisions of this section do not apply to a lease issued under AS

38.05.205

.

[Repealed, § 19 ch 56 SLA 1997.]

Failure to give notice under this section to a community council, a coordinating body established by community council, or an organization listed in (c)(5) of this section does not constitute a legal basis for invalidation or delay of the action.

History.

(§ 10 art III ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 8 ch 61 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 74 SLA 1961; am § 3 ch 117 SLA 1976; am § 14 ch 257 SLA 1976; am §§ 39, 40 ch 85 SLA 1979; am § 4 ch 108 SLA 1981; am § 36 ch 113 SLA 1981; am § 3 ch 87 SLA 1982; am §§ 44 — 46 ch 152 SLA 1984; am §§ 6, 7 ch 100 SLA 1988; am §§ 15, 16 ch 145 SLA 1988; am § 5 ch 124 SLA 1990; am § 7 ch 35 SLA 1994; am §§ 6, 7 ch 38 SLA 1994; am § 5 ch 138 SLA 1996; am §§ 17, 19 ch 56 SLA 1997; am §§ 27, 28 ch 91 SLA 1997; am § 4 ch 118 SLA 2000; am § 44 ch 49 SLA 2004; am § 6 ch 31 SLA 2005; am §§
22, 23 ch 27 SLA 2012; am § 3 ch 57 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly
AS

38.05.345

. Renumbered in 1984. In 1994, paragraph (a)(7) was added to give effect to the amendment to (a)(3) made by § 7,
ch. 35, SLA 1994, which paragraph was also amended by § 6,
ch. 38, SLA 1994.

Subsections (d) and (h) were each enacted as (g).
Renumbered in 1988, at which time former subsections (d) — (f) were renumbered as (e) — (g), respectively.

Administrative Code. —

For aquatic farmsite permits and leases, see 11 AAC 63.

For administrative provisions, see 11 AAC 67, art. 1.

For competitive bidding, see 11 AAC 82, art. 4.

For exploration licensing, see 11 AAC 82, art. 9.

For geothermal unitization, see 11 AAC 84, art. 8.

For practice and procedure, see 11 AAC 88.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective November 8, 2016, added (a)(7).

Opinions of attorney general. —

It must be assumed that the public notice requirement of this section applies equally to surface and minerals disposals actions.
November 25, 1977, Op. Att’y Gen.

The public notice requirement of AS

38.05.945

probably does not apply to the automatic lease term extension that occurs as a consequence of unitization since such extension is a measure to enhance the feasibility of unitized operation, not a disposal action.
November 25, 1977, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 38.05.946.
Hearings.

A municipality or a corporation entitled to receive notice under AS

38.05.945(c)

may hold a hearing within 30 days after receipt of the notice. If a hearing is held, the commissioner shall attend the hearing. The commissioner has discretion to hold a public hearing.

[Repealed, § 38 ch 91 SLA 1997.]

History.

(§ 36 ch 113 SLA 1981; am § 17 ch 145 SLA 1988; am § 38 ch 91 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 38.05.345(d) and renumbered as AS

38.05.346

in 1981.
Renumbered again in 1984.

Sec. 38.05.950.
Interference with bidding prohibited; penalties.

A person who bargains, contracts, or agrees, or attempts to bargain, contract, or agree with another that the other may not bid freely upon or purchase any parcel of land of the state offered at public sale; or by intimidation, combination, or unfair management, hinders, prevents, or attempts to hinder or prevent, a person from bidding upon or purchasing a tract of land offered for sale is punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000 or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both.

History.

(§ 3 (e) art XIII ch 169 SLA 1959; added by § 22 ch 61 SLA 1960)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

38.05.355

. Renumbered in 1984.

Sec. 38.05.965.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires,

“acquired land” means land belonging to the state including tide, submerged, and shoreland which has been obtained by escheat, purchase, or any means other than by general land grant;

“agricultural land” means land chiefly valuable for agricultural purposes;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of natural resources;

“department” means the Department of Natural Resources;

“director” means the director of the division of lands of the Department of Natural Resources;

“geothermal resources” means the natural heat of the earth at temperatures greater than 120 degrees Celsius, measured at the point where the highest-temperature resources encountered enter or contact a well or other resource extraction device, and includes

the energy, including pressure, in whatever form present in, resulting from, created by, or that may be extracted from that natural heat;

the material medium, including the geothermal fluid naturally present, as well as substances artificially introduced to serve as a heat transfer medium; and

all dissolved or entrained minerals and gases that may be obtained from the material medium, but excluding hydrocarbon substances and helium;

“grazing land” means land chiefly valuable for grazing purposes;

“industrial and commercial land” means land chiefly valuable for industrial trade, manufacturing, or business use;

“initial project term” means the duration sufficient to support an investment decision by the sponsors of a North Slope natural gas project to permit realization of a competitive economic return, to enable necessary financing, and to support agreements for the sale of hydrocarbons transported on a North Slope natural gas project;

“lieu and indemnity land” means land which the state is entitled to select under the provisions of the Act of March 4, 1915, 38 Stat. 1214 (48 U.S.C. 353), as amended, or a similar statute to compensate for land in place of surveyed rectangulars, which have been lost to the state by reason of deficient sections, prior rights, claims, withdrawals, reservations, and other appropriations;

“materials”

means all common variety rock and minerals of any quality, that are saleable and not subject to location under state or federal mining laws;

includes aggregate, riprap, railroad ballast, road ballast, road metal, peat, silt, loam, sand, gravel, stone, pumice, and common clay;

“mineral land” means land prospectively valuable for mineral deposits;

“multiple use” has the meaning given in AS

38.04.910

;

“navigable water” means any water of the state forming a river, stream, lake, pond, slough, creek, bay, sound, estuary, inlet, strait, passage, canal, sea or ocean, or any other body of water or waterway within the territorial limits of the state or subject to its jurisdiction that is navigable in fact in any season, whether in a frozen or liquid state, and for any useful public purpose, including water suitable for commercial navigation, floating of logs, landing and takeoff of aircraft, and public boating, trapping, hunting waterfowl and aquatic animals, fishing, or other public recreational purposes;

“nonconventional gas” means coal bed methane, gas contained in shales, or gas hydrates;

“North Slope natural gas project” means a project to produce or transport natural gas from state oil and gas and gas only leases that include land north of 68 degrees North latitude for transport in a gaseous state from the North Slope;

“park and recreation land” means land chiefly valuable for public park and recreation use;

“preference right forest lease” means a lease granted to a lessee whose United States Forest Service term special use permit was cancelled to allow the land under permit to be selected by the state;

“preference right grazing lease” means a grazing lease granted to a lessee whose federal grazing lease was cancelled to allow the land under lease to be selected by the state;

“project services” means services provided by a gas treatment plant, pipeline, liquefaction facility, or marine terminal, marine transportation services, or other services necessary to transport natural gas to market;

“public water” means navigable water and all other water, whether inland or coastal, fresh or salt, that is reasonably suitable for public use and utility, habitat for fish and wildlife in which there is a public interest, or migration and spawning of fish in which there is a public interest;

“rule of approximation” is the rule which is applied in determining whether or not a lease complies with the area limits set forth in this chapter and regulations adopted under it and in keeping the boundaries of leased land coincidental with legal subdivisions; under the rule, if the area covered by a lease in excess of the permitted maximum is smaller than the area of any deficiency that would result by eliminating from the lease the smallest legal subdivision covered by the lease or application for lease, the excess area will be permitted to remain in the lease; if the excess area is greater than the deficient area would be, then the smallest legal subdivision will be eliminated from the lease;

“shoreland” means land belonging to the state which is covered by nontidal water that is navigable under the laws of the United States up to ordinary high water mark as modified by accretion, erosion, or reliction;

“state land” or “land” means all land, including shoreland, tideland, and submerged land, or resources belonging to or acquired by the state;

“submerged land” means land covered by tidal water between the line of mean low water and seaward to a distance of three geographical miles or further as may hereafter be properly claimed by the state;

“tideland” means land that is periodically covered by tidal water between the elevation of mean high water and mean low water;

“timber land” means state land chiefly valuable for timber and other forest products;

“university land”

means

all sections 33 reserved to the university under the Act of March 4, 1915, 38 Stat. 1214, as amended;

all land granted to or reserved for the benefit of the university that retains its designation as university land;

all other land owned in fee by the University of Alaska including land transferred in fee to the Board of Regents of the University of Alaska to replace land formerly designated as university land;

does not include former university land that has been conveyed to the department under the settlement approved by the legislature in ch. 22, SLA 1983.

History.

(§ 2 art I ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 61 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 74 SLA 1961; am § 3 ch 31 SLA 1964; am §§ 2, 3 ch 72 SLA 1966; am § 8 ch 143 SLA 1968; am § 4 ch 117 SLA 1976; am § 15 ch 181 SLA 1978; am § 5 ch 175 SLA 1980; am § 47 ch 152 SLA 1984; am § 45 ch 50 SLA 1989; am §§ 35, 36 ch 30 SLA 1992; am § 45 ch 49 SLA 2004; am § 24 ch 27 SLA 2012; am § 33 ch 14 SLA 2014; am § 2 ch 14 SLA 2016; am § 4 ch 57 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

38.05.365

. Renumbered and reorganized to alphabetize the defined terms in 1984, 1992, 2004, and 2014.

Administrative Code. —

For shore fisheries leasing, see 11 AAC 64.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective May 9, 2014, added (26) [now (9)], (27) [now (16)], and (28) [now (20)].

The first 2016 amendment, effective August 31, 2016, in (14), inserted “in any season, whether in a frozen or liquid state, and” preceding “for any useful”; deleted “but not limited to” preceding “water suitable”; and made a stylistic change.

The second 2016 amendment, effective November 8, 2016, in (24), substituted “shoreland, tideland” for “shore, tide”.

Editor’s notes. —

Despite the provisions of AS

38.05.005

and

38.05.010

, the division of lands has been changed administratively to the division of mining, land, and water.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Reference to “laws of the United States” in paragraph (15)’s (now paragraph (23)) definition of “shoreland” simply indicates that the legislature recognizes that federal law applies in determining navigability for title purposes.
June 10, 1982, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 38.05.990.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Alaska Land Act.

History.

(§ 1 art I ch 169 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

38.05.370

. Renumbered in 1984.